Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2104.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2104.3. A. Any Except as provided for in subsection D
of this section, any person purchasing a new or used manufactured
home or owning a manufactured home which has not been registered in
this state pursuant to the provisions of Section 6 of this act
Section 1115 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall pay the
excise tax levied by Section 2103 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes of this title at the time such person is applying for a
certificate of title for such manufactured home.
Req. No. 3688 Page 1

B. The value of any manufactured home for the purposes of the
excise tax levied by Section 2103 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title shall be determined as of the date the person
applying for a certificate of title obtained either legal ownership
or possession of the manufactured home. Such date shall be presumed
to be the actual date of sale or other transfer of legal ownership
and assignment of the certificate of title. The value of a new
manufactured home shall be one-half (1/2) of the actual retail
selling price of such a home excluding Oklahoma state taxes. The
value of a used manufactured home shall be sixty-five percent (65%)
of one-half (1/2) of the new actual retail selling price of said
such home, excluding Oklahoma state taxes.
C. The excise tax collected pursuant to subsection B of this
section shall be apportioned in accordance with the provisions of
Section 2102 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
D. Any person purchasing a new or used manufactured home or
owning a manufactured home that is applying for a certificate of
title for the manufactured home and provides proof of paid current
calendar year ad valorem tax, by submission of a Manufactured Home
Certificate (OTC Form 936) or any other proof accepted by Service
Oklahoma, shall be exempt from all but a portion of the excise tax
levied pursuant to Section 2103 of this title equal to thirty one-
hundredths percent (0.30%) of the value of the manufactured home, as
determined by subsection B of this section.
Req. No. 3688 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-3688 QD 2/23/2026 5:31:22 PM





















Req. No. 3688 Page 3